Hawaii statutes.
§431:10A-204 Optional provision,
examination and autopsy. There may be a provision that the insurer shall
have the right and opportunity to examine the person of any individual covered
under the policy when and so often as it may reasonably require during the
pendency of claim under the policy and also the right and opportunity to make
an autopsy in case of death where it is not prohibited by law. [L 1987, c 347,
pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next